Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-113 Prevention of insolvencies.
To aid in the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies:

(1) The board of directors, upon majority vote, may
make recommendations to the commissioner on matters generally related to
improving or enhancing regulation for solvency; and

(2) At the conclusion of any domestic insurer
insolvency in which the association was obligated to pay covered claims, the
board of directors may prepare a report on the history and causes of the
insolvency, based on the information available to the association, and submit
the report to the commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 93, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next